Louisiana, session 2026, HB71.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 9:2793.12(B) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
9:2793.12(A)(3) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2793.12. Limitation of liability; concealed handgun permit; definitions; exceptions
A.
* * *
(3) The term "authorized person" shall also apply to any armed security
officer as defined by R.S. 37:3272(A)(2) who has completed the training
requirements provided by R.S. 37:3284(B)(2) and who has been issued an armed
registration card by the Louisiana State Board of Private Security Examiners.
B. An authorized person as defined in this Section shall not be liable for
damages for any injury, death, or loss suffered by a perpetrator when the injury,
death, or loss is caused by a justified use of force or self-defense through the
discharge of a firearm by the authorized person. An armed security officer is entitled
to the limitation of liability provided for in this Section only if the perpetrator is
wielding a dangerous weapon as defined in R.S. 14:2 at the time the armed security
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 71 ENROLLED
officer injures the perpetrator. This provision shall preclude any right of action by
the perpetrator, his survivors, or his heirs.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.